Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 1
GENERAL

11-57-101. Applicability.

This article applies to bonds, notes, warrants, certificates, or other securities evidencing loans or the advancement of moneys, to be issued by or on behalf of the state or any political subdivision thereof or any district, public board, commission, authority, or other public body corporate in the state pursuant to any general or special act or pursuant to any legislative or home rule charter.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 510, § 1, effective April 21.

11-57-102. Form - payment and transfer of securities.

The securities described in section 11-57-101 shall be in such registered or bearer form, with or without interest coupons; be subject to such conditions for transfer; be subject to such provisions for conversion as to denomination or to bearer or registered form; be made registerable or payable, or both, by the treasurer or other officer of the issuing entity, or by such trustee, registrar, paying agent, or transfer agent within or without this state; be issued, transferred, and registered by such book entry; be in such denomination or denominations; bear such dates, signatures, and authentications; and be held in custody by such depository within or without this state, all as may be determined by the entity or the governing body of the entity authorized or empowered to issue such securities. Payment at designated due dates or in installments may be required by the authorizing proceedings to be by check, draft, or other medium of payment and need not be conditioned upon presentation of any security or coupon. Signatures on any printed securities issued under this article or any other statute may be manually subscribed or by facsimile, but any such printed security, other than an interest coupon, shall bear at least one manual signature, which, notwithstanding the provisions of section 11-55-103 (1) or any other law, may be that of an official of the issuing entity or of the trustee, registrar, or transfer agent.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 510, § 1, effective April 21.

11-57-103. Determination by resolution or ordinance.

The determination of the body authorized or empowered to issue such securities required by section 11-57-102 shall be made in the resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of such securities or in any ordinance, resolution, or other instrument supplemental thereto.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 511, § 1, effective April 21.

11-57-104. No restriction on other acts.

This article shall constitute an additional and separate grant of powers which may be exercised without regard to any other act which contains the same subject matter; except that this article shall not be deemed to be a restriction or limitation on the exercise of powers by an issuing entity under any other act or home rule legislation.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 511, § 1, effective April 21.

11-57-105. Records - registered public obligations.

Records, with regard to the ownership of or security interests in registered public obligations, shall not be subject to inspection or copying under any law of this state relating to the right of the public to inspect or copy public records, notwithstanding any law to the contrary.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 399, § 1, effective March 26.